Tennessee statutes. Title 41 Correctional Institutions and Inmates
Chapter 24

Private Prison Contracting
Act of 1986

41-24-101. Short title.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Private Prison Contracting Act of 1986.”

Acts 1986, ch. 932, § 1.

Cross-References. Penalty for violation of standards set for private facilities, § 41-4-140.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 21 Tenn. Juris., Prisons and Prisoners, § 2.

Law Reviews.

Liability of State Officials and Prison Corporations for Excessive Use of Force Against Inmates of Private Prisons, 40 Vand. L. Rev. 983 (1987).

Privatization and Prisons (E.S. Savas), 40 Vand. L. Rev. 889 (1987).

Tennessee's Private Prison Act of 1986: An Historical Perspective with Special Attention to California's Experience (Ward M. McAfee), 40 Vand. L. Rev. 851 (1987).

The Implications of Prison Privatization on the Conduct of Prisoner Litigation Under 42 U.S.C. Section 1983 (Susan L. Kay), 40 Vand. L. Rev. 867 (1987).

The Privatization of Correctional Institutions: The Tennessee Experience (W.J. Michael Cody, Andy D. Bennett), 40 Vand. L. Rev. 829 (1987).

41-24-102. Chapter definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Commissioner” means the commissioner of correction;

“Correctional services” means the following functions, services and activities, when provided within a prison or otherwise:

Education, training and jobs programs;

Recreational, religious and other activities;

Development and implementation assistance for classification, management information systems, or other information systems or services;

Food services, commissary, medical services, transportation, sanitation or other ancillary services;

Counseling, special treatment programs, or other programs for special needs;

Operation of facilities other than transitional facilities, including management, custody of inmates, security, and other associated services and activities; and

Operation of transitional facilities;

“Department” means the department of correction;

“Prison” or “facility” means any adult institution operated by or under the authority of the department;

“Prison contractor” or “contractor” means any entity entering a contractual agreement with the commissioner to provide correctional services to inmates under the custody of the department;

“TDOC liaison” means any person appointed by the commissioner to act as the commissioner's on-site designee so that powers and duties not delegable to the contractor shall be carried out with the authority of the state; and

“Transitional facility” means any adult institution operated by a nonprofit entity under the authority of the department providing short-term transitional services to offenders within one (1) year of release on parole or expiration of sentence, excluding offenders convicted of a sexual offense; provided, however, that the total number of such facilities statewide shall not exceed four (4), and that the total number of beds in such facilities statewide shall not exceed, collectively, one hundred fifty (150).

Acts 1986, ch. 932, § 2; 2001, ch. 132, §§ 1, 2; 2010, ch. 1041, § 1.

41-24-103. Contracts for correctional services.

The commissioner is authorized to enter into contracts for correctional services only as provided in this chapter.

Contracts for correctional services, may be entered into subject to the requirements and procedures of former §§ 12-4-109 and 12-4-110 [See the Compiler’s Notes] and any additional requirements specified in this chapter.

A contract for correctional services as defined in § 41-24-102(2)(F) is authorized only for one (1) medium security or minimum security facility opened after July 1, 1991, and only according to the requirements and procedures specified in this chapter. No contract shall be authorized for a facility intended primarily to serve special needs inmates.

Any inmate sentenced to confinement in the department shall be legally eligible to be incarcerated in a facility in which a prison contractor is providing correctional services pursuant to this chapter.

Contracts for correctional services may include incentives or disincentives; provided, that the incentives or disincentives are based on quantifiable measurements of performance that are described in the request for proposal and contract. The total of all incentive payments shall not exceed five percent (5%) of the total contract price per annum. This subsection (e) shall not be construed to prohibit or restrict the use of liquidated damages as a remedy for a contractor's breach of contract.

Acts 1986, ch. 932, § 3; 1991, ch. 176, § 1; 2001, ch. 132, § 3.

Compiler's Notes. Former §§ 12-4-109 and 12-4-110, referred to in this section, were recodified by Acts 2013, ch, 403, effective July 1, 2013. Provisions similar to former § 12-4-109 were transferred to other sections within title 12, ch. 3, parts 1 and 3. Provisions similar to former § 12-4-110 were transferred to § 12-3-303.

41-24-104. Review and approval of contract proposals — Price and cost adjustments — Cancellations.

Any contract for correctional services as defined in § 41-24-102(2)(F) shall be entered into only after each of the following requirements and/or conditions are met:

Any request for proposals, any original contract, any contract renewal and any price or cost adjustment or any other amendment to any contract shall first be approved by the following:

The state building commission;

The attorney general and reporter; and

The commissioner;

The fiscal review committee shall review any request for proposals, any original contract and any proposed contract renewal and may submit comments to the authorities listed in subdivision (a)(1). Any comment shall be submitted to such authorities no later than thirty (30) days after receipt of the request for proposals, original contract or proposed contract renewal by the committees. The authorities listed in subdivision (a)(1) shall withhold their final action until such thirty-day period has ended or until they have received the committee's comments, whichever first occurs;

Any request for proposals, any original contract and any proposed contract renewal shall be submitted by the department of correction to the state and local government committee of the senate and the committee of the house of representatives having oversight over corrections. The committees may review and submit comments to the authorities listed in subdivision (a)(1). Any comment shall be submitted to those authorities no later than thirty (30) days after receipt of the request for proposals, original contract or proposed contract renewal by the committees. The authorities listed in subdivision (a)(1) shall withhold their final action until such thirty-day period has ended or until they have received the committee's comments, whichever first occurs;

To be considered for an award of a contract, the proposer must demonstrate to the satisfaction of each of the officials set forth in subdivision (a)(1) that it has:

The qualifications, operations and management experience and experienced personnel necessary to carry out the terms of the contract;

The ability to comply with applicable correctional standards and specific court orders, if required; and

Demonstrated history of successful operation and management of other correctional facilities; and

Proposer must agree that the state may cancel the contract at any time after the first year of operation, without penalty to the state, upon giving ninety (90) days' written notice.

Any contract pursuant to this section may provide for annual contract price or cost adjustments; provided, that any adjustments may be made only once each year effective upon the anniversary of the effective date of the contract. If any adjustment is made pursuant to terms of the contract, it shall be applied to total payments made to the contractor for the previous contract year and shall not exceed the percent of change in the average consumer price index (all items-city average), which is published by the United States department of labor, bureau of labor statistics, between that figure for the latest calendar year and the next previous calendar year.

Any price or cost adjustments to any contract different than those authorized by subdivision (b)(1) may be made only if the general assembly specifically authorizes those adjustments and appropriates funds for that purpose, if required.

No award of any contract shall be made unless an acceptable proposal is received pursuant to any request for proposal. An “acceptable” proposal means a proposal that meets all the requirements or conditions or both set forth in this chapter and meets all the requirements in the request for proposal.

No proposal shall be accepted unless:

The proposal offers a level and quality of services that are at least equal to those that would be provided by the state in accordance with § 41-24-105; and

The cost of the private operation and the cost to the state to monitor the private operation, shall be at least five percent (5%) less than the state's cost for essentially the same services in accordance with § 41-24-105 as determined by the department of correction and reviewed by the office of the comptroller.

Should the state be required to assume the operation of any facility contracted under this chapter, preference in state employment shall be given to persons who are employees of the contractor at the time of the state's assumption of operation of that facility.

Any preference in employment must be in compliance with title 8, chapter 30, and § 41-1-116, and performance of duties as an employee of the contractor must have been satisfactory.

Acts 1986, ch. 932, § 4; 1991, ch. 176, § 2; 2001, ch. 132, §§ 4-6; 2011, ch. 410, § 2(m); 2013, ch. 165, § 1; 2013, ch. 236, § 65; 2019, ch. 345, § 73.

Code Commission Notes.

For fiscal year CPI changes, see the County Technical Assistance Service website at http://www.ctas.tennessee.edu.

Compiler's Notes. For the Preamble to the act concerning the prohibition against establishment of a special committee if there is a standing committee on the same subject, please refer to Acts 2011, ch. 410.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “committee of the house of representatives having oversight over corrections” for “state government committee of the house of representative” in (a)(2)(B).

Effective Dates. Acts 2019, ch. 345, § 148. May 10, 2019.

Attorney General Opinions. Comparative evaluation of privately managed and state managed prisons for contract renewal, OAG 99-170, 1999 Tenn. AG LEXIS 138 (8/30/99).

41-24-105. Performance criteria for contracts — Contract term and renewal — Comparison of performance — Reporting.

Prior to the awarding of any contract to provide correctional services as defined in § 41-24-102(2)(F), the state shall establish objective performance criteria and cost criteria for both the state and private contractor. The performance criteria shall measure the quality of management, security and safety, personnel training, inmate programs and treatment and other topics deemed appropriate. The performance criteria and cost criteria shall be established and incorporated as requirements in any proposed request for proposal and any contract and shall be used as the basis for any comparison between the state and any contractor.

For any contract to provide correctional services as defined in § 41-24-102(2)(F), the initial contract term shall be for a period of three (3) years in order to allow the contractor sufficient time to demonstrate its performance and to provide sufficient information to allow a comparison of the performance of the contractor to the performance of the state in providing similar services; provided, however, to allow sufficient time for completion and review of any comparative evaluation, that the initial term may exceed three (3) years by a period of up to four (4) months as necessary to make the end of the initial term coincide with the state's fiscal year. The initial contract may include an option to renew for an additional period of two (2) years, subject to this section. The comparison or comparative evaluation between the state and private contractor shall not serve as the basis for contract renewal pursuant to subsection (c), but shall serve as a consideration.

After the first two (2) years of operation, but before renewing the initial contract, the performance of the contractor shall be compared to the performance of the state for similar services as set out in the contract. The contract may be renewed only if the contractor is providing essentially the same quality of services as the state at a cost of five percent (5%) lower than the state as set out in the contract, or if the contractor is providing services superior in quality to those provided by the state at essentially the same cost as set out in the contract. For the purposes of this subsection (c) and for comparison, “essentially the same” means the difference is no greater than five percent (5%). For the purpose of this section and comparison “superior” means a difference greater than five percent (5%). The methodology for determining the measurement of five percent (5%) differences shall also be set out in the request for proposal and contract.

The quality of services provided by the contractor and by the state shall be compared by a committee designated by the speakers of the senate and the house of representatives. The committee shall determine the quality of services provided by the contractor and the state by applying the performance criteria set out in the request for proposal and contract pursuant to subsection (a) and provide a numerical score for the state and the contractor. The committee shall report its determination to the parties responsible for determining whether the contract should be renewed.

The fiscal review committee, or, in the absence of that committee, any other committee designated by the speakers of the senate and the house of representatives, shall compare the cost measures as established in this chapter and set out in the request for proposal and the contract for service and provide a prisoner per day cost for the state and the contractor. The committee shall report its determination to the parties responsible for determining whether the contract should be renewed.

Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, a contract to provide correctional services as defined in § 41-24-102(2)(F) may be extended beyond the term specified in subsection (b) as determined necessary and appropriate by the commissioner for the purpose of evaluating the department’s operational strategy for the use of the contract facility. Any such extension may be for a period not to exceed twelve (12) months. A contract amendment accomplishing such an extension shall require the approval of the authorities listed in § 41-24-104(a)(1) and the opportunity for review and comment by the entities listed in § 41-24-104(a)(2).

Acts 1986, ch. 932, § 5; 1991, ch. 176, §§ 3, 4; 2001, ch. 132, § 7; 2006, ch. 883, § 1; 2011, ch. 410, § 2(n); 2012, ch. 936, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. For the Preamble to the act concerning the prohibition against establishment of a special committee if there is a standing committee on the same subject, please refer to Acts 2011, ch. 410.

Attorney General Opinions. Comparative evaluation of privately managed and state managed prisons for contract renewal, OAG 99-170, 1999 Tenn. AG LEXIS 138 (8/30/99).

41-24-106. Standards of security — Resumption of state control on termination of contract.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter to the contrary, prior to entering a contract for providing the security function for any prison, such as providing correctional officers or other persons providing security and control over inmates, the following requirements shall be met:

A plan shall be developed and certified by the governor that demonstrates the method by which the state would resume control of the prison upon contract termination. This plan shall be submitted for review and comment to the state and local government committee of the senate and the committee of the house of representatives having oversight over corrections and the committees shall solicit comments from law enforcement agencies, district attorneys general, and criminal judges in the county in which the prison is located and the surrounding counties. State officials responsible for approving any contract for the security function or any contract that includes provision of security are encouraged to await the comments of the state and local government committee of the senate and the state government committee of the house of representatives prior to executing any such contract; and

The commissioner shall certify to the state and local government committee of the senate and the committee of the house of representatives having oversight over corrections that the security procedures proposed by the contractor are equal or superior to the security procedures in effect at existing state-operated prisons and the commissioner shall comment on the relationship of the procedures proposed by the contractor to each standard of security and control specified in the standards for adult correctional institutions by the American Correctional Association.

Acts 1986, ch. 932, § 6; 2011, ch. 410, § 2(o), (p); 2013, ch. 236, § 64; 2019, ch. 345, § 74.

Compiler's Notes. For the Preamble to the act concerning the prohibition against establishment of a special committee if there is a standing committee on the same subject, please refer to Acts 2011, ch. 410.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “committee of the house of representatives having oversight over corrections” for “state government committee of the house of representatives” in (1) and (2).

Effective Dates. Acts 2019, ch. 345, § 148. May 10, 2019.

41-24-107. Financial information from contractor — Insurance requirements — Sovereign immunity.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter to the contrary, no contract for correctional services as defined in § 41-24-102(2)(F), shall be entered into unless the following requirements are met:

The contractor provides audited financial statements for the previous five (5) years or for each of the years the contractor has been in operation, if fewer than five (5) years, and provides other financial information as requested; and

The contractor provides an adequate plan of insurance, specifically including insurance for civil rights claims, as determined by an independent risk management or actuarial firm with demonstrated experience in public liability for state governments. The firm shall be selected by the commissioner of commerce and insurance with the concurrence of the board of claims. In determining the adequacy of the plan, the firm shall determine whether:

The insurance is adequate to protect the state from any and all actions by a third party against the contractor or the state as a result of the contract;

The insurance is adequate to protect the state against any and all claims arising as a result of any occurrence during the term of the contract; that is, the insurance is adequate on an occurrence basis, not on a claims-made basis;

The insurance is adequate to assure the contractor's ability to fulfill its contract with the state in all respects and to assure that the contractor is not limited in this ability because of financial liability that results from judgments; and

The insurance is adequate to satisfy such other requirements specified by the independent risk management or actuarial firm.

The sovereign immunity of the state shall not apply to the contractor. Neither the contractor nor the insurer of the contractor may plead the defense of sovereign immunity in any action arising out of the performance of the contract.

Acts 1986, ch. 932, § 7.

41-24-108. Application of certain criminal laws to contractor-operated facilities.

The provisions of title 39, chapter 16, including, without limitation, § 39-16-201 and §§ 39-16-605 — 39-16-608, shall apply to offenses committed by or with regard to inmates assigned to facilities or programs for which a prison contractor is providing correctional services.

Acts 1986, ch. 932, § 8; 1996, ch. 675, § 43.

41-24-109. Monitoring of contractor performance — Reports.

In addition to other powers and duties prescribed by law, the commissioner shall monitor any contracts with prison contractors providing correctional services and shall report at least annually, or as requested, to the state and local government committee of the senate and the committee of the house of representatives having oversight over corrections or any other legislative committee regarding the performance of the contractor. The comptroller of the treasury shall audit the performance of the department of correction and the private contractor to ensure that the state is receiving the quality and level of services as described in the contract based upon the performance criteria, the monitoring process and any applicable sanctions that might be incurred. The comptroller shall report annually, or as otherwise requested, to the state and local government committee of the senate and the committee of the house of representatives having oversight over corrections.

Acts 1986, ch. 932, § 9; 2001, ch. 132, § 8; 2011, ch. 410, § 2(q), (r); 2013, ch. 236, § 64; 2019, ch. 345, § 75.

Compiler's Notes. For the Preamble to the act concerning the prohibition against establishment of a special committee if there is a standing committee on the same subject, please refer to Acts 2011, ch. 410.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “committee of the house of representatives having oversight over corrections” for “state government committee of the house of representatives” twice.

Effective Dates. Acts 2019, ch. 345, § 148. May 10, 2019.

41-24-110. Powers and duties not delegable to contractor.

No contract for correctional services shall authorize, allow or imply a delegation of the authority or responsibility of the commissioner to a prison contractor for any of the following:

Developing and implementing procedures for calculating inmate release and parole eligibility dates;

Developing and implementing procedures for calculating and awarding sentence credits;

Approving inmates for furlough and work release;

Approving the type of work inmates may perform and the wages or sentence credits that may be given to inmates engaging in that work; and

Granting, denying or revoking sentence credits, placing an inmate under less restrictive custody or more restrictive custody; or taking any disciplinary actions.

Acts 1986, ch. 932, § 10.

Attorney General Opinions. Operation of prison industry program by privately managed prison, OAG 99-023, 1999 Tenn. AG LEXIS 28 (2/9/99).

41-24-111. Application of certain administrative laws to contractor.

All existing provisions of law shall apply to a prison contractor except as provided in this section or otherwise provided in this chapter:

Title 12, chapter 3, relative to public purchases, shall not apply to purchases and procurements of a prison contractor providing correctional services;

Title 8, chapter 30, relative to state service, shall not apply to employees of a prison contractor;

A prison contractor providing correctional services shall not be bound by provisions of law governing the appointment, qualifications and duties of wardens, superintendents and other correctional employees, including provisions of title 4, chapter 6, and chapter 1 of this title, except as required to comply with the Constitution of Tennessee; and

Title 8, chapters 34 and 35, relative to membership in the Tennessee consolidated retirement system, shall not apply to employees of a prison contractor, except as provided specifically in this chapter.

Acts 1986, ch. 932, § 11; 2012, ch. 800, § 49.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2012, ch. 800, § 1 provided that the act, which amended subdivision (2), shall be known and cited as the “Tennessee Excellence, Accountability, and Management (T.E.A.M.) Act of 2012.”

41-24-112. Consolidated retirement system.

The following provisions shall govern eligibility for membership in the Tennessee consolidated retirement system for employees of a prison contractor providing correctional services as defined in § 41-24-102(2)(F):

Department of correction employees in positions under the control and supervision of the department that become subject to a contract with a prison contractor and who are members of the retirement system immediately preceding the contract implementation date shall remain eligible to continue membership under the same conditions that apply to state employees. Those employees shall make the same contributions and be eligible for the same benefits as state employees; and

Any other person, including any person employed or re-employed after the date a prison contractor assumes the management and operation of a department facility, shall not be eligible for membership in the Tennessee consolidated retirement system.

An employee who participates in the Tennessee consolidated retirement system may not participate in any retirement plan offered by the prison contractor. Any employee eligible under subsection (a) may continue membership or may elect to withdraw membership from the retirement system as follows:

An election to withdraw shall take place within thirty (30) days after the employee completes one (1) year of employment under the prison contractor;

Upon the election to withdraw, the employee may receive a refund of accumulated contributions;

The election to withdraw constitutes a waiver of any right, present or future, to reestablish that service at a later date based on employment at a correctional facility under a prison contractor; and

If an election to withdraw is not made within the thirty-day period, the employee shall be deemed to have elected continued membership in the retirement system. Withdrawal at a later date will be permitted only upon the termination of service with the prison contractor.

In no event will a department employee be allowed to retire and receive benefits while continuing employment with a prison contractor.

The prison contractor shall make normal contributions, special accrued liability contributions, and cost of living contributions, as determined by an actuarial valuation, in the same way as for state employee members, for one (1) year for each employee described in subsection (b) and for each employee who thereafter elects to continue membership in the retirement system.

The prison contractor shall pay contributions to the board of trustees of the retirement system according to a schedule set by the board.

The department shall serve as administrative agent between the prison contractor and the Tennessee consolidated retirement system.

Acts 1986, ch. 932, § 12.

41-24-113. Rights of employees of contractor.

The following provisions shall govern the rights of employees of the state who become employees of the contractor.

Any employee of the contractor who was formerly an employee of the state shall have the following rights while in the employ of the contractor:

The employee shall be allowed to be a member of any qualified employee organization pursuant to § 8-23-204 and the employee shall be allowed, if the employee so elects, to pay dues in the qualified employee organization through payroll deduction; provided, that no employee of a contractor shall be deemed a state employee for the purpose of determining whether a given employee organization qualifies for payroll deduction of membership dues pursuant to § 8-23-204, nor shall the employee's membership in any employee organization qualified under § 8-23-204 be considered to be a violation of § 8-23-204;

The contractor shall give a hiring preference for available positions to laid-off employees of the department; and

Employees laid off by the contractor shall be given the same reemployment rights with the state as current state employees.

Any employee of the contractor who was formerly a state employee, who ceases employment with the contractor and returns to the employ of the state, shall have the following rights:

The employee shall retain all sick leave and annual leave that has been accumulated, but not greater than the amounts of leave that would have been accumulated had the employee been continuously in the employ of the state;

The employee shall be credited with any time of service with the contractor toward calculation of longevity pay benefits; and

The employee shall be admitted to the state group insurance program without proof of insurability.

Acts 1986, ch. 932, § 13.

41-24-114. [Reserved.]

The commissioner is authorized and directed to promulgate rules and regulations pursuant to the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5, as required to effectuate the purposes of this chapter.

Acts 1986, ch. 932, § 15.

41-24-116. Escape from private prison or facility.

Section 39-16-606 shall apply to the appropriate official of a prison or facility operated by a private prison contractor when any inmate housed in the prison or facility escapes from the private contractor prison or facility.

Acts 1998, ch. 829, § 1.

41-24-117. Records relating to inmates in private facilities.

The records and other documents concerning any inmate who is sentenced to the custody of the department of correction and is being housed in a prison or facility operated by a private prison contractor shall be public records to the same extent such records are public if an inmate is being housed in a department of correction facility.

Acts 1998, ch. 942, § 1.

Cross-References. Confidentiality of public records, § 10-7-504.

41-24-118. Transfer of employees of community services agencies to the department of correction.

Notwithstanding any provisions of law to the contrary, including [former] § 8-30-309, and recognizing the years of faithful and dedicated service to the department by the employees of community services agencies providing correctional health services for the department, community services agency employees who serve in jobs that would be classified as career service, as defined in [former] § 8-30-208, had they been employed in the state service, and whose functions and positions are transferred to the department by the commissioner on or before July 1, 2005, shall be transferred into the department and shall receive the benefits and protection of career service status, and shall be eligible for participation in the state health insurance plan on June 7, 2005, without further examination or competition.

No employee so transferred shall be subject to § 8-30-308, as a result of this transfer, if the employee has worked for the community services agencies for a length of time equal to the probationary period applying to the equivalent state service position; and, if not, the employee shall complete the probationary period after the employee's transfer to the department.

All transfers shall take place no later than July 1, 2005.

Transfers of employees from the community services agencies to the department, pursuant to this section, shall not result in any diminution, impairment or interruption of current salary, accrued sick and annual leave, seniority, participation in the Tennessee consolidated retirement system, or amounts already accrued under a deferred compensation plan; provided, however, that this shall not impair the department's authority, through established policies and procedures, to correct salary disparities.

Any employee so transferred shall be eligible for promotion pursuant to title 8, chapter 30, after the transfer takes effect.

Acts 2005, ch. 358, § 1; 2012, ch. 800, § 49.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2012, ch. 800, § 1 provided that the act, which amended subsection (b), shall be known and cited as the “Tennessee Excellence, Accountability, and Management (T.E.A.M.) Act of 2012.”

41-24-119. Terms of release of out-of-state prisoner incarcerated in Tennessee.

For the purposes of this section, unless the context otherwise requires, “out-of-state prisoner” means a person incarcerated in a correctional facility within this state on behalf of a state other than Tennessee or a governmental entity whose jurisdiction is outside of Tennessee. “Out-of-state prisoner” does not include a person incarcerated on behalf of an Indian tribe or on behalf of the United States.

Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, after May 8, 2007, no prison contractor shall contract to accept an out-of-state prisoner for incarceration within any correctional facility operated by the prison contractor within Tennessee unless the sending state contractually agrees to return, and to pay the full costs of returning, the prisoner to the sending state prior to the prisoner's release from incarceration.

Acts 2007, ch. 110, § 2.

41-24-115. Rules and regulations.